Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.52.321

Certification of candidates.

No later than the day following the certification of the returns of any primary, the secretary of state shall certify to the appropriate county auditors the names of all candidates qualified to appear on the general election ballot.

[ 2013 c 11 s 52; 2004 c 271 s 146.]